Nebraska, session 109, LB988.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB988 LB988
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 18-2101, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
18-2101 Sections 18-2101 to 18-2158 and sections 9 to 12 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Community Development Law.
Sec. 2. Section 18-2103, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
18-2103 For purposes of the Community Development Law, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(1) Affordable housing means (a) workforce housing, (b) housing
targeted for households earning less than one hundred fifty percent of
the median income for the county in which such housing is located, or (c)
housing under section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(2) Area of operation means and includes the area within the
corporate limits of the city and such land outside the city as may come
within the purview of sections 18-2123 and 18-2123.01;
(3) Authority means any community redevelopment authority created
pursuant to section 18-2102.01 and any community development agency
created pursuant to section 18-2101.01 and does not include a limited
community redevelopment authority;
(4) Blighted area means an area (a) which, by reason of the presence
of a substantial number of deteriorated or deteriorating structures,
existence of defective or inadequate street layout, faulty lot layout in
relation to size, adequacy, accessibility, or usefulness, insanitary or
unsafe conditions, deterioration of site or other improvements, diversity
of ownership, tax or special assessment delinquency exceeding the fair
value of the land, defective or unusual conditions of title, improper
subdivision, obsolete or no platting, or the existence of conditions
which endanger life or property by fire and other causes, or any
combination of such factors, substantially impairs or arrests the sound
growth of the community, retards the provision of housing accommodations,
or constitutes an economic or social liability and is detrimental to the
-2-

LB988 LB988
2026 2026
public health, safety, morals, or welfare in its present condition and
use, and (b) in which there is at least one of the following conditions:
(i) Unemployment in the designated area is at least one hundred twenty
percent of the state or national average; (ii) the average age of the
residential or commercial units in the area is at least forty years;
(iii) more than half of the plotted and subdivided property in an area is
unimproved land that has been within the city for forty years and has
remained unimproved during that time; (iv) the per capita income of the
area is lower than the average per capita income of the city or village
in which the area is designated; (v) the area has had either stable or
decreasing population based on the last two decennial censuses; or (vi)
less than twenty percent of the housing in the area is affordable
housing, and (c) which contains no less than one uninhabitable structure
as determined by an inspector designated by the governing body or at
least one recently demolished structure. An inspector may declare a
structure permanently uninhabitable once the structure has been found to
be (a) unstable and subject to collapse, in whole or in part, (b)
allowing elemental intrusion, or (c) containing an unresolved safety
hazard. In no event shall a city of the metropolitan, primary, or first
class designate more than thirty-five percent of the city as blighted, a
city of the second class shall not designate an area larger than fifty
percent of the city as blighted, and a village shall not designate an
area larger than one hundred percent of the village as blighted. A
redevelopment project involving a formerly used defense site as
authorized under section 18-2123.01, any area which is located within a
good life district established under the Good Life Transformational
Projects Act, and any area declared to be an extremely blighted area
under section 18-2101.02 shall not count towards the percentage
limitations contained in this subdivision;
(5) Bonds means any bonds, including refunding bonds, notes, interim
certificates, debentures, or other obligations issued pursuant to the
-3-

LB988 LB988
2026 2026
Community Development Law except for bonds issued pursuant to section
18-2142.04;
(6) Business means any private business located in an enhanced
employment area;
(7) City means any city or incorporated village in the state;
(8) Clerk means the clerk of the city or village;
(9) Community redevelopment area means a substandard and blighted
area which the community redevelopment authority designates as
appropriate for a redevelopment project;
(10) Effective date of the redevelopment project means the date that
a redevelopment project is approved by a majority vote of the governing
body;
(11) (10) Employee means a person employed at a business as a result
of a redevelopment project;
(12) (11) Employer-provided health benefit means any item paid for
by the employer in total or in part that aids in the cost of health care
services, including, but not limited to, health insurance, health savings
accounts, and employer reimbursement of health care costs;
(13) (12) Enhanced employment area means an area not exceeding six
hundred acres (a) within a community redevelopment area which is
designated by an authority as eligible for the imposition of an
occupation tax or (b) not within a community redevelopment area as may be
designated under section 18-2142.04;
(14) (13) Equivalent employees means the number of employees
computed by (a) dividing the total hours to be paid in a year by (b) the
product of forty times the number of weeks in a year;
(15) (14) Extremely blighted area means a substandard and blighted
area in which: (a) The average rate of unemployment in the area during
the period covered by the most recent American Community Survey 5-Year
Estimate is at least two hundred percent of the average rate of
unemployment in the state during the same period; and (b) the average
-4-

LB988 LB988
2026 2026
poverty rate in the area exceeds twenty percent for the total federal
census tract or tracts or federal census block group or block groups in
the area;
(16) (15) Federal government means the United States of America, or
any agency or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the United
States of America;
(17) (16) Governing body or local governing body means the city
council, board of trustees, or other legislative body charged with
governing the municipality;
(18) (17) Limited community redevelopment authority means a
community redevelopment authority created pursuant to section 18-2102.01
having only one single specific limited pilot project authorized;
(19) (18) Mayor means the mayor of the city or chairperson of the
board of trustees of the village;
(20) (19) New investment means the value of improvements to real
estate made in an enhanced employment area by a developer or a business;
(21) (20) Number of new employees means the number of equivalent
employees that are employed at a business as a result of the
redevelopment project during a year that are in excess of the number of
equivalent employees during the year immediately prior to the year that a
redevelopment plan is adopted;
(22) (21) Obligee means any bondholder, agent, or trustee for any
bondholder, or lessor demising to any authority, established pursuant to
section 18-2102.01, property used in connection with a redevelopment
project, or any assignee or assignees of such lessor's interest or any
part thereof, and the federal government when it is a party to any
contract with such authority;
(23) (22) Occupation tax means a tax imposed under section
18-2142.02;
(24) (23) Person means any individual, firm, partnership, limited
liability company, corporation, company, association, joint-stock
-5-

LB988 LB988
2026 2026
association, or body politic and includes any trustee, receiver,
assignee, or other similar representative thereof;
(25) (24) Public body means the state or any municipality, county,
township, board, commission, authority, district, or other political
subdivision or public body of the state;
(26) (25) Real property means all lands, including improvements and
fixtures thereon, and property of any nature appurtenant thereto, or used
in connection therewith, and every estate, interest and right, legal or
equitable, therein, including terms for years and liens by way of
judgment, mortgage, or otherwise, and the indebtedness secured by such
liens;
(27) (26) Redeveloper means any person, partnership, or public or
private corporation or agency which enters or proposes to enter into a
redevelopment contract;
(28) (27) Redevelopment contract means a contract entered into
between an authority and a redeveloper for the redevelopment of an area
in conformity with a redevelopment plan;
(29) (28) Redevelopment plan means a plan, as it exists from time to
time for one or more community redevelopment areas, or for a
redevelopment project, which (a) conforms to the general plan for the
municipality as a whole and (b) is sufficiently complete to indicate such
land acquisition, demolition and removal of structures, redevelopment,
improvements, and rehabilitation as may be proposed to be carried out in
the community redevelopment area, zoning and planning changes, if any,
land uses, maximum densities, and building requirements;
(30) (29) Redevelopment project means any work or undertaking in one
or more community redevelopment areas: (a) To acquire substandard and
blighted areas or portions thereof, including lands, structures, or
improvements the acquisition of which is necessary or incidental to the
proper clearance, development, or redevelopment of such substandard and
blighted areas; (b) to clear any such areas by demolition or removal of
-6-

LB988 LB988
2026 2026
existing buildings, structures, streets, utilities, or other improvements
thereon and to install, construct, or reconstruct streets, utilities,
parks, playgrounds, public spaces, public parking facilities, sidewalks
or moving sidewalks, convention and civic centers, bus stop shelters,
lighting, benches or other similar furniture, trash receptacles,
shelters, skywalks and pedestrian and vehicular overpasses and
underpasses, enhancements to structures in the redevelopment plan area
which exceed minimum building and design standards in the community and
prevent the recurrence of substandard and blighted conditions, and any
other necessary public improvements essential to the preparation of sites
for uses in accordance with a redevelopment plan; (c) to sell, lease, or
otherwise make available land in such areas for residential,
recreational, commercial, industrial, or other uses, including parking or
other facilities functionally related or subordinate to such uses, or for
public use or to retain such land for public use, in accordance with a
redevelopment plan; and may also include the preparation of the
redevelopment plan, the planning, survey, and other work incident to a
redevelopment project and the preparation of all plans and arrangements
for carrying out a redevelopment project; (d) to dispose of all real and
personal property or any interest in such property, or assets, cash, or
other funds held or used in connection with residential, recreational,
commercial, industrial, or other uses, including parking or other
facilities functionally related or subordinate to such uses, or any
public use specified in a redevelopment plan or project, except that such
disposition shall be at its fair value for uses in accordance with the
redevelopment plan; (e) to acquire real property in a community
redevelopment area which, under the redevelopment plan, is to be repaired
or rehabilitated for dwelling use or related facilities, repair or
rehabilitate the structures, and resell the property; (f) to carry out
plans for a program of voluntary or compulsory repair, rehabilitation, or
demolition of buildings in accordance with the redevelopment plan; and
-7-

LB988 LB988
2026 2026
(g) to carry out construction of affordable housing;
(31) (30) Redevelopment project valuation means the valuation for
assessment of the taxable real property in a redevelopment project last
certified for the year prior to the effective date of the redevelopment
project provision authorized in section 18-2147;
(32) (31) Rural community means any municipality in a county with a
population of fewer than one hundred thousand inhabitants as determined
by the most recent federal decennial census;
(33) (32) Substandard area means an area in which less than twenty
percent of the housing is affordable housing or in which there is a
predominance of buildings or improvements, whether nonresidential or
residential in character, which, by reason of dilapidation,
deterioration, age or obsolescence, inadequate provision for ventilation,
light, air, sanitation, or open spaces, high density of population and
overcrowding, or the existence of conditions which endanger life or
property by fire and other causes, or any combination of such factors, is
conducive to ill health, transmission of disease, infant mortality,
juvenile delinquency, and crime, (which cannot be remedied through
construction of prisons), and is detrimental to the public health,
safety, morals, or welfare. A substandard area shall not include any real
property classified as agricultural or horticultural land as defined in
section 77-1343 or any real property containing no permanent structure or
recently demolished structure; and
(34) (33) Workforce housing means:
(a) Housing that meets the needs of today's working families;
(b) Housing that is attractive to new residents considering
relocation to a rural community;
(c) Owner-occupied housing units that cost not more than two hundred
seventy-five thousand dollars to construct or rental housing units that
cost not more than two hundred thousand dollars per unit to construct.
For purposes of this subdivision (c), housing unit costs shall be updated
-8-

LB988 LB988
2026 2026
annually by the Department of Economic Development based upon the most
recent increase or decrease in the Producer Price Index for all
commodities, published by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau
of Labor Statistics;
(d) Owner-occupied and rental housing units for which the cost to
substantially rehabilitate exceeds fifty percent of a unit's assessed
value; and
(e) Upper-story housing.
Sec. 3. Section 18-2117.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
18-2117.01 (1)(a) On or before December 1 each year, each city which
has approved one or more redevelopment plans which are financed in whole
or in part through the division of taxes as provided in section 18-2147
shall provide a report to the Property Tax Administrator on each such
redevelopment plan which includes the following information:
(i) A copy of the redevelopment plan and any amendments thereto,
including the date upon which the redevelopment plan was approved, the
effective date of the redevelopment project for dividing the ad valorem
tax as provided to the county assessor pursuant to subsection (6) of
section 18-2147, and the location and boundaries of the property in the
redevelopment project; and
(ii) A short narrative description of the type of development
undertaken by the city or village with the financing and the type of
business or commercial activity locating within the redevelopment project
area as a result of the redevelopment project.
(b) If a city has approved one or more redevelopment plans using an
expedited review under section 18-2155, the city may file a single report
under this subsection for all such redevelopment plans.
(2) The report required under subsection (1) of this section must be
filed each year, regardless of whether the information in the report has
changed, except that a city is not required to refile a copy of the
-9-

LB988 LB988
2026 2026
redevelopment plan or an amendment thereto if such copy or amendment has
previously been filed.
(3) The Property Tax Administrator shall compile a report for each
active redevelopment project, based upon information provided by the
cities pursuant to subsection (1) of this section and information
reported by the county assessor or county clerk on the certificate of
taxes levied pursuant to section 77-1613.01. Each report shall be
electronically transmitted to the Clerk of the Legislature not later than
March 1 each year. The report may include any recommendations of the
Property Tax Administrator as to what other information should be
included in the report from the cities so as to facilitate analysis of
the uses, purposes, and effectiveness of tax-increment financing and the
process for its implementation or to streamline the reporting process
provided for in this section to eliminate unnecessary paperwork.
Sec. 4. Section 18-2143, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
18-2143 The powers conferred by the Community Development Law shall
be in addition and supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law
and shall be independent of and in addition to any other provision of the
laws of the State of Nebraska with reference to the matters covered in
the Community Development Law and shall be considered as a complete and
independent act and not as amendatory of or limited by any other
provision of the laws of the State of Nebraska. Notwithstanding any other
evidence of legislative intent, it is hereby declared to be the
controlling legislative intent that if any provision of the Community
Development Law, or the application thereof to any person or
circumstances is held unconstitutional or invalid, it shall not affect
the other provisions of the Community Development Law or the application
of such provision to other persons or circumstances. All The Community
Development Law and all grants of power, authority, rights, or discretion
made to a city and to an authority created under the Community
-10-

LB988 LB988
2026 2026
Development Law shall be liberally construed, and all incidental powers
necessary to carry into effect the Community Development Law are hereby
expressly granted to and conferred upon a city or an authority created
pursuant thereto.
Sec. 5. Section 18-2147, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
18-2147 (1) Any redevelopment plan as originally approved or as
later modified pursuant to section 18-2117 may contain a provision that
any ad valorem tax levied upon real property, or any portion thereof, in
a redevelopment project for the benefit of any public body shall be
divided, for the applicable period described in subsection (4) of this
section, as follows:
(a) That portion of the ad valorem tax which is produced by the levy
at the rate fixed each year by or for each such public body upon the
redevelopment project valuation shall be paid into the funds of each such
public body in the same proportion as are all other taxes collected by or
for the body. When there is not a redevelopment project valuation on a
parcel or parcels, the county assessor shall determine the redevelopment
project valuation based upon the fair market valuation of the parcel or
parcels as of January 1 of the year prior to the year that the ad valorem
taxes are to be divided. The county assessor shall provide written notice
of the redevelopment project valuation to the authority as defined in
section 18-2103 and the owner. The authority or owner may protest the
valuation to the county board of equalization within thirty days after
the date of the valuation notice. All provisions of section 77-1502
except dates for filing of a protest, the period for hearing protests,
and the date for mailing notice of the county board of equalization's
decision are applicable to any protest filed pursuant to this section.
The county board of equalization shall decide any protest filed pursuant
to this section within thirty days after the filing of the protest. The
county clerk shall mail a copy of the decision made by the county board
-11-

LB988 LB988
2026 2026
of equalization on protests pursuant to this section to the authority or
owner within seven days after the board's decision. Any decision of the
county board of equalization may be appealed to the Tax Equalization and
Review Commission, in accordance with section 77-5013, within thirty days
after the date of the decision;
(b) That portion of the ad valorem tax on real property, as provided
in the redevelopment contract, bond resolution, or redevelopment plan, as
applicable, in the redevelopment project in excess of such amount, if
any, shall be allocated to and, when collected, paid into a special fund
of the authority to be used solely to pay the principal of, the interest
on, and any premiums due in connection with the bonds of, loans, or
notes, or advances of money to, or indebtedness incurred by, whether
funded, refunded, assumed, or otherwise, such authority for financing or
refinancing, in whole or in part, the specific redevelopment project for
which the tax was collected and pledged. Funds and excess funds generated
from a redevelopment project and funds repayable to a government entity
shall not be shared with other redevelopment projects nor shall any such
excess funds be pooled into any other fund to be allocated to other
development or infrastructure projects and shall not be retained to pay
for future expenses not covered or specified in the original
redevelopment plan. When such bonds, loans, notes, advances of money, or
indebtedness, including interest and premiums due, have been paid, the
authority shall so notify the county assessor and county treasurer and
all ad valorem taxes upon taxable real property in such a redevelopment
project shall be paid into the funds of the respective public bodies. An
authority may use a single fund for purposes of this subdivision for all
redevelopment projects or may use a separate fund for each redevelopment
project; and
(c) Any interest and penalties due for delinquent taxes shall be
paid into the funds of each public body in the same proportion as are all
other taxes collected by or for the public body.
-12-

LB988 LB988
2026 2026
(2) To the extent that a redevelopment plan authorizes the division
of ad valorem taxes levied upon only a portion of the real property
included in such redevelopment plan, any improvements funded by such
division of taxes shall be related to the redevelopment plan that
authorized such division of taxes.
(3)(a) For any redevelopment plan located in a city of the
metropolitan class that includes a division of taxes, as provided in this
section, that produces, in whole or in part, funds to be used directly or
indirectly for (i) new construction, rehabilitation, or acquisition of
housing for households with annual incomes below the area median income
for households and located within six hundred yards of a public passenger
streetcar or (ii) new construction, rehabilitation, or acquisition of
single-family housing or condominium housing used as primary residences
for individuals with annual incomes below the area median income for
individuals, such housing shall be deemed related to the redevelopment
plan that authorized such division of taxes regardless of whether such
housing is or will be located on real property within such redevelopment
plan, as long as such housing supports activities occurring on or
identified in such redevelopment plan.
(b) During each fiscal year in which the funds described in
subdivision (a) of this subsection are available, the authority and city
shall make best efforts to allocate not less than thirty percent of such
funds to single-family housing deemed related to the redevelopment plan
described under such subdivision.
(c) In selecting projects to receive funding, the authority and city
shall develop a qualified allocation plan and give first priority to
financially viable projects that serve the lowest income occupants for
the longest period of time.
(4)(a) For any redevelopment plan for which more than fifty percent
of the property in the redevelopment project area has been declared an
extremely blighted area in accordance with section 18-2101.02, ad valorem
-13-

LB988 LB988
2026 2026
taxes shall be divided for a period not to exceed twenty years after the
effective date of the redevelopment project as identified in the project
redevelopment contract or in the resolution of the authority authorizing
the issuance of bonds pursuant to section 18-2124.
(b) For all other redevelopment plans, ad valorem taxes shall be
divided for a period not to exceed fifteen years after the effective date
of the redevelopment project as identified in the project redevelopment
contract, in the resolution of the authority authorizing the issuance of
bonds pursuant to section 18-2124, or in the redevelopment plan,
whichever is applicable.
(5) The effective date of the redevelopment project under a
provision dividing ad valorem taxes as provided in subsection (4) of this
section shall not occur until such time as the real property in the
redevelopment project is within the corporate boundaries of the city.
This subsection shall not apply to a redevelopment project involving a
formerly used defense site as authorized in section 18-2123.01.
(6) All notices of the redevelopment project provision for dividing
ad valorem taxes shall be sent by the authority to the county assessor on
forms prescribed by the Property Tax Administrator. The notice shall be
sent to the county assessor on or before July 1 of the year of the
effective date of the redevelopment project provision. Failure to satisfy
the notice requirement of this section shall result in the taxes, for all
taxable years affected by the failure to give notice of the effective
date of the redevelopment project provision, remaining undivided and
being paid into the funds for each public body receiving property taxes
generated by the property in the redevelopment project. However, the
redevelopment project valuation for the remaining division of ad valorem
taxes in accordance with subdivisions (1)(a) and (b) of this section
shall be the last certified valuation for the taxable year prior to the
effective date of the redevelopment project provision to divide the taxes
for the remaining portion of the twenty-year or fifteen-year period
-14-

LB988 LB988
2026 2026
pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.
(7) Once a redevelopment project has been paid off, the treasurer of
the governing body shall redirect any excess revenue related to such
redevelopment project to the taxing entity.
Sec. 6. Section 18-2148, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
18-2148 Commencing on the effective date of the redevelopment
project provision outlined in section 18-2147, the county assessor, or
county clerk where he or she is ex officio county assessor, of the county
in which the redevelopment project is located, shall transmit to an
authority and the county treasurer, upon request of the authority, the
redevelopment project valuation and shall annually certify, on or before
August 20, to the authority and the county treasurer the current
valuation for assessment of taxable real property in the redevelopment
project. The county assessor shall undertake, upon request of an
authority, an investigation, examination, and inspection of the taxable
real property in the redevelopment project and shall reaffirm or revalue
the current value for assessment of such property in accordance with the
findings of such investigation, examination, and inspection.
Sec. 7. Section 18-2150, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
18-2150 In the proceedings for the issuance of bonds, the making of
loans or advances of money, or the incurring of any indebtedness, whether
funded, refunded, assumed, or otherwise, by an authority to finance or
refinance, in whole or in part, a redevelopment project, the portion of
taxes mentioned in subdivision (1)(b) of section 18-2147 shall be pledged
for the payment of the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on
such bonds, loans, notes, advances, or indebtedness.
Sec. 8. Section 18-2153, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
18-2153 The powers conferred by sections 18-2147 to 18-2153 shall be
-15-

LB988 LB988
2026 2026
in addition and supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law and
shall be independent of and in addition to any other provision of the
laws of the State of Nebraska with reference to the matters covered in
such sections. All The provisions of such sections and all grants of
power, authority, rights, or discretion to a city or village and to an
authority created under the Community Development Law shall be liberally
construed, and all incidental powers necessary to carry into effect such
sections are hereby expressly granted to and conferred upon a city or
village or an authority created pursuant to the Community Development
Law.
Sec. 9. For purposes of a redevelopment plan, an area, other than a
site with a Highway Historical Marker as determined pursuant to section
82-120 or a property of historical value or significance as determined by
the governing body, which contains a structure shall not be declared
substandard and blighted or extremely blighted unless the structure has
been declared permanently uninhabitable by an inspector designated by the
governing body. Such inspector may declare a structure permanently
uninhabitable once the structure has been found to be:
(1) Unstable and subject to collapse, in whole or in part;
(2) Allowing elemental intrusion; or
(3) Containing an unresolved safety hazard.
Sec. 10. The division of taxes as provided in section 18-2147 shall
not be used for a public transportation project unless first approved by
a majority vote of the people in the voting precincts where such public
transportation project is located.
Sec. 11. To prevent abuses of the Community Development Law, no
part of a redevelopment project area may be declared substandard and
blighted or extremely blighted twice during the twenty-year period after
the effective date of the redevelopment project for such area unless such
declaration has been approved by the Governor due to emergency.
Sec. 12. For purposes of a redevelopment project or redevelopment
-16-

LB988 LB988
2026 2026
plan, the terms debt and indebtedness shall refer solely to the principal
of a loan or mortgage, the interest on a loan or mortgage, any premiums
due in connection with the bonds, loans, mortgages, or notes or any other
financial liabilities incurred by, whether funded, refunded, assumed, or
otherwise, such authority for financing or refinancing, in whole or in
part, the specific redevelopment project or redevelopment plan for which
taxes were collected and pledged.
Sec. 13. Original sections 18-2143, 18-2148, 18-2150, and 18-2153,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, section 18-2117.01, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, and sections 18-2101, 18-2103, and
18-2147, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-17-